dev/vro-est.twol
Alphabet 

 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q:0 r s š t u v w õ ä ö ü x y z ž %':i 

 %{e%}:e %{a%}:a %{u%}:u %{ö%}:ö

 %, %. %: %; %! 

 ;

Sets

Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s š t v w x y z ž %'  ;

Vow = a e i o u õ ä ö ü ; 

Stop = p t k ; 

Punct = %, %. %: %; %! ; 

Rules


"Word final õ"
õ:e <=>       _ (:0) .#. ; 
        :Stop _ :Stop ; 
         _ :Cns+ .#. ; 

!! suurõq:suure
!@ s:s u:u u:u r:r õ:e q:0

"Final q deletion"
q:0 <=> _  .#. ;

"-h suffix realised as -s"
h:s <=> _ .#. ; 

!! pääväh:päevas
!@ p:p ä:ä ä:e v:v ä:a h:s

"Word final ' is -i"
%':i <=> _ .#. ; 

!õ:o <=> _
!õ:õ <=> _
